Louisiana, session 2026, SB52.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:525(C)(14) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§525. State child ombudsman; duties
* * *
C. The state child ombudsman shall have all of the following duties and
responsibilities:
* * *
(14) Conduct an annual review of the implementation of R.S. 46:109 by
the Department of Children and Family Services and the Louisiana Department
of Health, including the timely compliance with reporting requirements and a
review of department procedures.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 46:109 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§109. Public assistance benefits; change in household; reporting; fraud
A. For the purpose of assisting the Louisiana Department of Health in
identifying changes in household circumstances for benefit allotments, the
Department of Children and Family Services shall report identifying
information to the Louisiana Department of Health within three business days
following a hearing held pursuant to Children's Code Article 624. The
Louisiana Department of Health shall determine the required information
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 52 ENROLLED
necessary to identify the child and the child's household.
B. Upon receipt of a report from the Department of Children and Family
Services pursuant to this Section, the Louisiana Department of Health shall
immediately complete all of the following:
(1) Review whether either of the child's parents is receiving any public
assistance benefits as a result of the child being included in the parent's
household.
(2) Adjust any Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, Special
Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, or Family
Independence Temporary Assistance Program benefits for the parent's
household to reflect the change in circumstance.
(3) If the child is enrolled in Medicaid, issue a new Medicaid managed
care insurance card for the child at the child's new residence.
C. If the child has not reached the age of eighteen at the time the child
is returned to the custody of the child's parent, the Department of Children and
Family Services shall report to the Louisiana Department of Health when the
child is returned to the custody of the child's parent.
D. If the Louisiana Department of Health receives an application for a
public assistance benefit for a child that is included in another household that
receives benefits, the department shall conduct an assessment to determine
where the child is currently residing and adjust the benefit allotment
accordingly.
E. If the Louisiana Department of Health determines that an individual
failed to report a required change in household circumstances and is receiving
public assistance benefits for a child that is no longer living in the household,
the Louisiana Department of Health shall report the individual to the fraud
detection unit of the Louisiana Department of Health for investigation and
recovery of ineligible benefits.
F. Upon written request of the state child ombudsman, the Department
of Children and Family Services and the Louisiana Department of Health shall
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 52 ENROLLED
provide access to any records identifying changes in household circumstances
or related to the adjustment of public assistance benefits as required by this
Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.